Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1056
Temporary practitioner, defined.

Temporary practitioner means a person licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to perform any or all of the practices of cosmetology for a limited time under the supervision at all times of a designated supervisor.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 33;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-372;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 318.